Georgia, session 2025_26, SB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The governing authority of Clinch County is authorized to adopt a resolution authorizing
the clerk of the Magistrate Court of Clinch County to charge and collect a technology fee in
an amount not to exceed $5.00, as set from time to time by the governing authority by
resolution, for every civil action filed, every estate filed, each conviction, as well as a
surcharge on each fine assessed by the magistrate court, and each filing of an affidavit,
except for affidavits of indigency. The magistrate court technology fee shall be assessed and
collected not more than once per party within any one action or proceeding. Such technology
fees shall be used exclusively to provide for technological needs of the Magistrate Court of
Clinch County. Such uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware, software, and accessory purchases;
S. B. 317
- 1 -

LC 44 2995
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware;
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of imaging, scanning, facsimile,
communications, projection, and printing equipment and software; and
(4) Procurement of services or equipment for the conversion of court records and
archives to digital content for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this Act shall be collected by the clerk of the magistrate
court and remitted to the governing authority of the county on a monthly basis. Such
proceeds shall be maintained by the governing authority of the county in a separate,
segregated account; provided, however, that as long as the probate judge and magistrate
judge are consolidated, the probate court technology fee and the magistrate court technology
fee may be maintained in a joint consolidated account and shall be expended solely for the
purposes enumerated in subsection (a) of this Act. Such account shall be audited by such
governing authority annually.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 317
- 2 -